Massachusetts, session 194th, H3758.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Class 2 electric bicycle” the following 
definition:- 
"Class 3 – an electric bicycle equipped with a motor that provides assistance only when 
the rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of 
28 miles per hour;" 
Section 1 of chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting within 
the definition of “Department” the following definition:- 
“'Electric bicycle”, a bicycle or tricycle equipped with fully operable pedals and an 
electric motor of 750 watts or less that meets the requirements of a class 1 electric bicycle, class 
2 electric bicycle, or class 3 electric bicycle." 

of 2 12  Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting in section 11B¾ the following:- 
A municipality, local authority or state agency with jurisdiction over a natural surface 
trail designated for bicycle use made by clearing and grading the soil, after public notice and a 
public hearing may adopt ordinances or regulations prohibiting or otherwise regulating the 
operation of electric bicycles on such paths, including, but not limited to, the imposition of speed 
limits." 
Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by striking in section 11B3/4 the following:- 
"(d) An electric bicycle shall not be operated on a trail designated for nonmotorized 
traffic, that a municipality, local authority or state agency has jurisdiction over, if such trail has a 
natural surface tread made by clearing and grading the soil and no surfacing materials have been 
added; provided, however, that a municipality, local authority or state agency after public notice 
and a public hearing may adopt ordinances or regulations permitting or otherwise regulating the 
use of electric bicycles on such a trail within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, the 
imposition of speed limits." 
Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by striking in section 11B3/4 (b) the following:- "that electric bicycles shall not be 
ridden or operated on sidewalks."